Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB37.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 2 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
The Treeing Walker Coonhound is named and designated as the official state dog of Kentucky.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 2 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Domestic cats (Felis catus) and dogs (Canis familiaris), both purebred and mixed breeds alike, that reside in or
have been adopted from Kentucky animal shelters or rescue organizations are named and designated as the
official pets of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 2 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
The eastern spotted skunk (Spilogale putorius) is named and designated as the official state nongame mammal of
Kentucky.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 2 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
The eastern hellbender (Cryptobranchus alleganiensis) is named and designated as the official state amphibian of
Kentucky.
Signed by Governor April 27, 2026.